Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1 Prohibited Practices Generally
2-19-144. Campaign advertising.

It is unlawful for any person to place or attach any type of show-card, poster, or advertising material or device, including election campaign literature, on any kind of poles, towers, or fixtures of any public utility company, whether privately or publicly owned or as defined in §65-4-101, unless legally authorized to do so.

Acts 1983, ch. 353, §§ 1-4; Acts 1997, ch. 45, § 1.